District of Columbia statutes.
4-1303.34

Immunity.

The District, the disclosing official, and any agencies, committees, officials, officers, employees, or attorneys of the District authorized by the disclosing official to assist the disclosing official with his or her responsibilities and duties under this part shall have full immunity from any civil or criminal liability relating to a decision made in good faith to disclose findings and information related to a child fatality or near fatality under this part.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IIIA, § 334
as added Feb. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-69, § 2(b), 48 DCR 11072
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see section 2(b) of Public Disclosure of Findings and Information in Cases of Child Fatality or Near Fatality Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-6, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2479).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of Public Disclosure of Findings and Information in Cases of Child Fatality or Near Fatality Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-191, November 29, 2001, 48 DCR 11233).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of Public Disclosure of Findings and Information in Cases of Child Fatality or Near Fatality Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-286, February 25, 2002, 49 DCR 2317).